Utah statutes.
78A-7-103.   Requirements by Judicial Council for creating and certifying justice courts.

(1)  The Judicial Council has the responsibility for promulgating and publishing minimum requirements both for the creation of new courts and the certification of existing courts. The council shall also review requests for waiver of the minimum requirements and may authorize the creation of a court by waiving compliance with minimum requirements or by allowing for an extension of time to meet the minimum requirements.

(2)  Existing justice courts shall be recertified at the end of each four-year term if they continue to meet the minimum requirements for the establishment of a new court.  Any existing court which does not meet the minimum requirements may request a review from the council, which may authorize the recertification of the court by waiving compliance with minimum requirements or by allowing for an extension of time to meet those requirements.

